Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 5. Transportation of Employees.

Administrative Code. —

For transportation of employees, see 8 AAC 20.

Collateral references. —

51B C.J.S., Labor Relations, § 1158.

Sec. 23.10.375.
Policy.

The welfare of the state demands that adequate provision be made for financing the return transportation of certain persons to their place of recruitment inside and outside the state upon termination of employment.

History.

(ch 67 SLA 1949)

Sec. 23.10.380.
Right to return transportation.

An employer who furnishes, finances, agrees to furnish or finance, or in any way provides transportation for a person from the place of hire to a point inside or outside the state to employ the person shall provide the person with return transportation to the place of hire from which transportation was furnished or financed, or to a destination agreed upon by the parties, with transportation to be furnished or financed

on or after the termination of employment for a cause considered good and sufficient by the department, beyond the control of the person, or on or after the termination of the contract of employment or a renewal of the contract; and

upon the request of the person or the department made within 45 days after the termination of employment.

Upon the termination of employment the subsistence of the employee may not continue longer than 10 days after the termination or until transportation is available, whichever occurs first.

History.

(§ 1 ch 67 SLA 1949; am § 1 ch 136 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 164 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For transportation of employees, see 8 AAC 20.

Sec. 23.10.385.
Enforcement by civil action.

The department may take a written assignment of a right of action provided by AS

23.10.380

, and may prosecute the action. The department may join various employees in one claim and in case of suit may join them in one action.

The general provisions of law respecting wage collection suits brought by the department in behalf of employees apply in an action brought under this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 67 SLA 1949)

Administrative Code. —

For transportation of employees, see 8 AAC 20.

Sec. 23.10.390.
Construction of contracts.

AS

23.10.375

—

23.10.400

are considered a part of every contract of hire involving transportation of an employee to and from this state or from one part of the state to another.

History.

(§ 2(a) ch 67 SLA 1949)

Sec. 23.10.395.
Orders and regulations.

The department may issue orders and adopt regulations necessary to carry out AS

23.10.375

—

23.10.400

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 67 SLA 1949)

Administrative Code. —

For transportation of employees, see 8 AAC 20.

Sec. 23.10.400.
Penalty.

An employer who violates AS

23.10.375

—

23.10.400

is, in addition to any civil liability, guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000.

History.

(§ 3 ch 67 SLA 1949)